Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-312
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 28-312 to 28-315, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Restrain shall mean to restrict a person's movement in such a manner as to interfere substantially with his liberty:

(a) By means of force, threat, or deception; or

(b) If the person is under the age of eighteen or incompetent, without the consent of the relative, person, or institution having lawful custody of him; and

(2) Abduct shall mean to restrain a person with intent to prevent his liberation by:

(a) Secreting or holding him in a place where he is not likely to be found; or

(b) Endangering or threatening to endanger the safety of any human being.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 27.